bg-BG: Тип част за въздушния пистолет: Адаптер; Цев; Болт; Уплътнение на затвора; Предна ръкохватка; Газово бутало; Предпазител за ръката; Пълнител; Монтаж/релса; Уплътнение на буталото; Предпазител; Комплект уплътнения/О-пръстени; Мерник; Спийдлоудър; Пружина; Приклад; Супресор; Спусъков механизъм; Клапанен механизъм; Друго
nl: BB-gun onderdeeltype: Adapter; Loop; Grendel; Breech-afdichting; Voorgreep; Gasram; Handbeschermer; Magazijn; Bevestiging/rail; Zuigerafdichting; Veiligheidspal; Afdichtings-/o-ringset; Vizier; Speedloader; Veer; Kolf; Geluiddemper; Trekkermechanisme; Ventielmechanisme; Overig
fr: Type de pièce pour pistolet à billes: Adaptateur; Canon; Verrou; Joint de culasse; Poignée avant; Vérin à gaz; Garde-main; Chargeur; Support/rail; Joint de piston; Sécurité; Kit de joints/joints toriques; Viseur; Chargeur rapide; Ressort; Crosse; Silencieux; Bloc détente; Assemblage de valve; Autre
sk-SK: Typ dielu vzduchovky: Adaptér; Hlaveň; Záver; Tesnenie záveru; Predná rukoväť; Plynový piest; Predpažbie; Zásobník; Montáž/lišta; Tesnenie piestu; Poistka; Súprava tesnení/O-krúžkov; Mieridlo; Rýchlonabíjač; Pružina; Pažba; Tlmič; Zostava spúšte; Zostava ventilu; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta dijela BB pištolja: Adapter; Cijev; Zatvarač; Brtva ležišta; Prednji rukohvat; Plinski klip; Rukohvat; Spremnik; Nosač/šina; Brtva klipa; Kočnica; Komplet brtvi / O-prstenova; Nišan; Brzi punjač; Opruga; Kundak; Prigušivač; Sklop okidača; Sklop ventila; Ostalo
en: BB gun part type: Adapter; Barrel; Bolt; Breech seal; Foregrip; Gas ram; Handguard; Magazine; Mount/rail; Piston seal; Safety; Seal/o-ring kit; Sight; Speedloader; Spring; Stock; Suppressor; Trigger assembly; Valve assembly; Other
da: Type af luftgeværsdele: Adapter; Løb; Bolt; Løbspakning; Forskæfte; Gasfjeder; Handguard; Magasin; Montering/skinne; Stempelpakning; Sikring; Paknings-/O-ringssæt; Sigte; Speedloader; Fjeder; Skæfte; Lyddæmper; Aftrækkersystem; Ventilsamling; Andet
cs: Typ dílu pro BB zbraně (vzduchovky / airsoftové zbraně): Adaptér; Hlaveň; Závěr; Těsnění závěru; Přední rukojeť; Plynový píst; Předpažbí; Zásobník; Montáž/kolejnice; Těsnění pístu; Pojistka; Sada těsnění / O-kroužků; Mířidlo; Rychlonabíječ; Pružina; Pažba; Tlumič; Sestava spouště; Sestava ventilu; Jiné
lt-LT: BB šautuvo dalies tipas: Adapteris; Vamzdis; Spyna; Spynos sandariklis; Priekinė rankena; Dujinė spyruoklė; Apsodas; Dėtuvė; Laikiklis / bėgelis; Stūmoklio sandariklis; Saugiklis; Sandariklių / O-žiedų rinkinys; Taikiklis; Greitojo pildymo įrankis; Spyruoklė; Buožė; Slopintuvas; Nuleistuko mechanizmas; Vožtuvo mechanizmas; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de peça da arma de pressão: Adaptador; Cano; Ferrolho; Vedação da culatra; Grip dianteiro; Pistão a gás; Guarda-mão; Carregador; Montagem/trilho; Vedação do pistão; Trava de segurança; Kit de vedação/o-ring; Mira; Speedloader; Mola; Coronha; Supressor; Conjunto do gatilho; Conjunto da válvula; Outro
ru: Тип детали пневматического пистолета: Адаптер; Ствол; Затвор; Уплотнение казенника; Тактическая рукоятка; Газовая пружина; Цевье; Магазин; Крепление/планка; Уплотнение поршня; Предохранитель; Ремкомплект уплотнений/колец; Прицел; Спидлоадер; Пружина; Приклад; Глушитель; Спусковой механизм в сборе; Клапанный узел; Другое
de: Typ des BB-Gewehrteils: Adapter; Lauf; Verschluss; Laufdichtung; Vordergriff; Gasdruckfeder; Handschutz; Magazin; Halterung/Schiene; Kolbendichtung; Sicherung; Dichtungs-/O-Ring-Set; Visier; Speedloader; Feder; Schaft; Schalldämpfer; Abzugsgruppe; Ventilgruppe; Sonstige
th: ประเภทชิ้นส่วนปืนบีบีกัน: อะแดปเตอร์; ลำกล้อง; สลัก; ซีลท้ายรังเพลิง; ด้ามจับหน้า; แก๊สแรม; กระบังมือ; แม็กกาซีน; ฐาน/รางยึด; ซีลลูกสูบ; เซฟตี้; ชุดซีล/โอริง; ศูนย์เล็ง; สปีดโหลดเดอร์; สปริง; พานท้าย; ปลอกเก็บเสียง; ชุดไกปืน; ชุดวาล์ว; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: BB 槍零件類型: 轉接器; 槍管; 槍機; 後膛密封圈; 前握把; 氣動活塞; 護木; 彈匣; 安裝座/導軌; 活塞密封圈; 保險; 密封圈/O 型環套件; 瞄準器; 填彈器; 彈簧; 槍托; 抑制器; 扳機組件; 氣閥組件; 其他
el: Τύπος εξαρτήματος αεροβόλου όπλου: Προσαρμογέας; Κάννη; Κλείστρο / κινητό ουραίο; Τσιμούχα κλείστρου; Εμπρόσθια λαβή; Αμορτισέρ αερίου (gas ram); Χειροφυλακτήρας; Γεμιστήρας; Βάση/Ράγα; Τσιμούχα εμβόλου; Ασφάλεια; Κιτ τσιμούχας/o-ring; Σκοπευτικό; Ταχυγεμιστήρας; Ελατήριο; Κοντάκι; Σιγαστήρας; Μηχανισμός σκανδάλης; Μηχανισμός βαλβίδας; Άλλο
hu: BB fegyver alkatrésztípusa: Adapter; Cső; Zár; Csőfar tömítés; Előagy; Gázrugó; Kézvédő; Tár; Szerelék/sín; Dugattyú tömítés; Biztosító; Tömítés/O-gyűrű készlet; Irányzék; Gyorstöltő; Rugó; Tusa; Hangtompító; Elsütőszerkezet; Szelepszerkezet; Egyéb
ko: 비비탄총 부품 유형: 어댑터; 배럴; 볼트; 브리치 씰; 포어그립; 가스 램; 핸드가드; 탄창; 마운트/레일; 피스톤 씰; 안전장치; 씰/O링 키트; 조준기; 스피드로더; 스프링; 개머리판; 소음기; 트리거 어셈블리; 밸브 어셈블리; 기타
ro-RO: Tipul piesei pentru pistolul BB: Adaptor; Țeavă; Închizător; Garnitură culată; Mâner frontal; Piston pe gaz; Apărătoare de mână; Încărcător; Suport/șină; Garnitură piston; Siguranță; Set de garnituri/inele O; Dispozitiv de ochire; Alimentator rapid; Arc; Pat; Amortizor; Ansamblu trăgaci; Ansamblu supapă; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de peça para arma de pressão: Adaptador; Cano; Ferrolho; Vedante da culatra; Punho dianteiro; Pistão a gás; Guarda-mão; Carregador; Suporte/calha; Vedante do pistão; Patilha de segurança; Kit de vedantes/O-rings; Mira; Carregador rápido; Mola; Coronha; Supressor; Conjunto de gatilho; Conjunto de válvula; Outro
fi: Ilmakiväärin osatyyppi: Sovitin; Piippu; Lukko; Perän tiiviste; Etukahva; Kaasujousi; Kädensuoja; Lipas; Kiinnike/kisko; Männän tiiviste; Varmistin; Tiivistesarja; Tähtäin; Pikalataaja; Jousi; Tukki; Äänenvaimennin; Liipaisinkoneisto; Venttiilikoneisto; Muu
vi: Loại phụ tùng súng BB: Bộ chuyển đổi; Nòng súng; Chốt khóa nòng; Gioăng khóa nòng; Ốp tay đệm; Trụ khí; Ốp lót tay; Băng đạn; Ngàm/thanh ray; Gioăng piston; Chốt an toàn; Bộ gioăng/đệm chữ O; Ống ngắm; Dụng cụ nạp đạn nhanh; Lò xo; Báng súng; Bộ giảm thanh; Cụm cò súng; Cụm van; Khác
ja: BBガン部品タイプ: アダプター; バレル; ボルト; ブリーチシール; フォアグリップ; ガスラム; ハンドガード; マガジン; マウント/レール; ピストンシール; セーフティ; シール/O リングキット; サイト; スピードローダー; スプリング; ストック; サプレッサー; トリガーアセンブリ; バルブアセンブリ; その他
es: Tipo de pieza de la pistola de balines: Adaptador; Cañón; Cerrojo; Sello de la recámara; Empuñadura delantera; Pistón de gas; Guardamanos; Cargador; Montura/riel; Sello del pistón; Seguro; Kit de sellos/juntas tóricas; Mira; Cargador rápido; Resorte; Culata; Supresor; Conjunto del gatillo; Conjunto de la válvula; Otro
zh-CN: BB 枪零件类型: 适配器; 枪管; 枪栓; 后膛密封圈; 前握把; 气压挺杆; 护木; 弹匣; 底座/导轨; 活塞密封圈; 保险; 密封圈/O 形圈套件; 瞄准器; 快速装弹器; 弹簧; 枪托; 消音器; 扳机组件; 阀门组件; 其他
it: tipo di parte per pistola ad aria compressa: Adattatore; Canna; Otturatore; Guarnizione della culatta; Impugnatura anteriore; Pistone a gas; Paramano; Caricatore; Supporto/slitta; Guarnizione del pistone; Sicura; Kit guarnizioni/o-ring; Mirino; Speedloader; Molla; Calcio; Silenziatore; Gruppo del grilletto; Gruppo valvola; Altro
tr: BB silahı parça tipi: Adaptör; Namlu; Sürgü; Kama contası; Ön tutamak; Gazlı piston; El kundağı; Şarjör; Montaj/ray; Piston contası; Emniyet; Conta/O-ring kiti; Nişangah; Hızlı doldurucu; Yay; Dipçik; Susturucu; Tetik grubu; Valf grubu; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta dela zračne puške: Adapter; Cev; Zaklep; Tesnilo zaklepišča; Prednji ročaj; Plinska vzmet; Obloga cevi; Nabojnik; Nosilec/letev; Tesnilo bata; Varovalka; Komplet tesnil/O-obročev; Merek; Hitri polnilnik; Vzmet; Kopito; Dušilec; Sklop sprožilca; Sklop ventila; Drugo
sv: Typ av BB-gevärsdel: Adapter; Pipa; Slutstycke; Piptätning; Främre grepp; Gaspistong; Handskydd; Magasin; Fäste/skena; Pistongtätning; Säkring; Tätnings-/o-ringssats; Sikte; Snabbladdare; Fjäder; Kolv; Ljuddämpare; Avtryckarmekanism; Ventilmekanism; Övrigt
nb: Type BB-pistoldel: Adapter; Løp; Bolt; Løpspakning; Frontgrep; Gassfjær; Håndbeskytter; Magasin; Feste/skinne; Stempelpakning; Sikring; Paknings-/O-ringsett; Sikte; Hurtiglader; Fjær; Kolbe; Lyddemper; Avtrekkermekanisme; Ventilmekanisme; Annet
pl: Typ części do wiatrówki BB: Adapter; Lufa; Zamek; Uszczelka lufy; Chwyt przedni; Sprężyna gazowa; Łoże; Magazynek; Montaż/szyna; Uszczelka tłoka; Bezpiecznik; Zestaw uszczelek/o-ringów; Celownik; Szybkoładowarka; Sprężyna; Kolba; Tłumik dźwięku; Mechanizm spustowy; Zespół zaworu; Inne